Connecticut, session 2026, HB05162.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subdivision (3) of subsection (c) of section 9 of public act
2 12-189, as amended by section 102 of public act 13-239, section 212 of
3 public act 15-1 of the June special session and section 157 of public act
4 16-4 of the May special session, is amended to read as follows (Effective
5 July 1, 2026):
6 (3) For the Department of Housing: Grant-in-aid to the Connecticut
7 Housing Finance Authority for the purposes of sections 8-265cc to 8-
8 265ii, inclusive, and section 8-265kk of the general statutes, and to
9 capitalize down payment assistance issued under the homeownership
10 loan program established pursuant to sections 8-283 to 8-289, inclusive,
11 of the general statutes, not exceeding $38,000,000.
sHB5162 / File No. 89 1

sHB5162 File No. 89
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 PA 12-189, Sec. 9(c)(3)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
The title was changed.
HSG Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5162 / File No. 89 2

sHB5162 File No. 89
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Treasurer, Debt Serv. GF - See Below See Below See Below
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill expands the eligible uses of an existing General Obligation
(GO) bond authorization for the Emergency Mortgage Assistance
Program to allow funds to be used for downpayment assistance. Future
General Fund debt service costs may be incurred or incurred sooner due
to the programs’ expansion to the degree that it causes authorized GO
bond funds to be expended or to be expended more quickly than they
otherwise would have been.
As of March 1, 2026, there is an unallocated bond balance of $5
million under the authorization. The bill does not change overall GO
bond authorization levels.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to any bonds issued.
sHB5162 / File No. 89 3

sHB5162 File No. 89
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5162
AN ACT AMENDING AN AUTHORIZATION OF BONDS FOR THE
CONNECTICUT HOUSING FINANCE AUTHORITY.